Utah statutes.
32B-1-404.   Presentation of proof of age upon request.

(1)  To obtain one or more of the following, an individual shall present proof of age at the request of a person listed in Subsection (2):

(a)  an alcoholic product;

(b)  admittance to a restricted area; or

(c)  employment that under this title may not be obtained by a minor.

(2)  To determine whether the individual described in Subsection (1) is 21 years of age, the following may request a person described in Subsection (1) to present proof of age:

(a)  an authorized person;

(b)  a peace officer;

(c)  a representative of the State Bureau of Investigation of the Department of Public Safety, established in Section 53-10-301; or

(d)  an authorized department employee.

